Utah statutes.
19-6-326.   Written assurances.

(1)  Based upon risk to human health or the environment from potential exposure to hazardous substances or materials, the executive director may issue enforceable written assurances to a bona fide prospective purchaser, contiguous property owner, or innocent landowner of real property that no enforcement action under this part may be initiated regarding that real property against the person to whom the assurances are issued.

(2)  An assurance granted under Subsection (1) grants the person to whom the assurance is issued protection from imposition of any state law cost recovery and contribution actions under this part. 

(3)  The executive director may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary for the administration of this section.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

